nb: Kompatibel interiørmateriale: Alcantara / semsket skinn; Teppe; Stofftrekk; Kunstskinn; Gulvmatter; Taktrekkstoff; Skinn; Mikrofibertrekk; Plastlister; Gummimatter; Vinyl; Annet
el: Συμβατό υλικό εσωτερικού: Alcantara/καστόρι; Μοκέτα; Υφασμάτινη ταπετσαρία; Τεχνητό δέρμα; Πατάκια; Ύφασμα ουρανού; Δέρμα; Ταπετσαρία από μικροΐνες; Πλαστική επένδυση; Πατάκια από καουτσούκ; Βινύλιο; Άλλο
de: Kompatibles Innenmaterial: Alcantara/Wildleder; Teppich; Stoffpolsterung; Kunstleder; Fußmatten; Dachhimmelstoff; Leder; Mikrofaserpolsterung; Kunststoffverkleidung; Gummimatten; Vinyl; Sonstige
es: Material interior compatible: Alcantara/gamuza; Alfombra; Tapicería de tela; Cuero sintético; Tapetes; Tela para el techo; Cuero; Tapicería de microfibra; Molduras de plástico; Tapetes de goma; Vinilo; Otro
ro-RO: Material interior compatibil: Alcantara / piele întoarsă; Mochetă; Tapițerie din material textil; Piele ecologică; Covorașe auto; Material plafon; Piele; Tapițerie din microfibră; Ornamente din plastic; Covorașe din cauciuc; Vinilin; Altele
zh-TW: 相容內裝材質: Alcantara 麂皮/麂皮; 地毯; 布面椅套; 合成皮; 腳踏墊; 車頂篷布料; 皮革; 超細纖維椅套; 塑膠飾板; 橡膠腳踏墊; 乙烯基; 其他
ru: Совместимый материал салона: Алькантара / замша; Ковролин; Тканевая обивка; Искусственная кожа; Коврики; Ткань для потолка; Кожа; Обивка из микрофибры; Пластиковая отделка; Резиновые коврики; Винил; Другое
fi: Yhteensopiva sisämateriaali: Alcantara / mokka; Matto; Kangasverhoilu; Tekonahka; Lattiamatot; Kattoverhoilukangas; Nahka; Mikrokuituverhoilu; Muovilistat; Kumimatot; Vinyyli; Muu
th: วัสดุภายในรถที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: อัลคันทารา/หนังกลับ; พรม; เบาะผ้า; หนังเทียม; พรมปูพื้น; ผ้าบุหลังคา; หนัง; เบาะไมโครไฟเบอร์; ชิ้นส่วนพลาสติก; ยางรองพื้น; ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
fr: Matériau intérieur compatible: Alcantara/daim; Moquette; Revêtement en tissu; Similicuir; Tapis de sol; Tissu de pavillon; Cuir; Revêtement en microfibre; Garnitures en plastique; Tapis en caoutchouc; Vinyle; Autre
sk-SK: Kompatibilný interiérový materiál: Alcantara/semiš; Koberec; Látkové čalúnenie; Umelá koža; Podlahové rohože; Látka na čalúnenie stropu; Koža; Čalúnenie z mikrovlákna; Plastové obloženie; Gumové rohože; Vinyl; Iné
en: Compatible interior material: Alcantara/suede; Carpet; Cloth upholstery; Faux leather; Floor mats; Headliner fabric; Leather; Microfiber upholstery; Plastic trim; Rubber mats; Vinyl; Other
ko: 호환 내장재 소재: 알칸타라/스웨이드; 카펫; 직물 내장재; 인조 가죽; 플로어 매트; 헤드라이너 패브릭; 가죽; 극세사 내장재; 플라스틱 트림; 고무 매트; 비닐; 기타
zh-CN: 适用内饰材质: 欧缔兰/绒面革; 地毯; 布艺软包; 人造革; 地垫; 车顶内衬织物; 真皮; 超细纤维软包; 塑料装饰件; 橡胶垫; 乙烯基; 其他
da: Kompatibelt indvendigt materiale: Alcantara/ruskind; Tæppe; Stofindtræk; Kunstlæder; Måtter; Stof til loftsbeklædning; Læder; Mikrofiberindtræk; Plastbeklædning; Gummimåtter; Vinyl; Andet
pl: Zgodny materiał wewnętrzny: Alcantara / zamsz; Wykładzina; Tapicerka materiałowa; Sztuczna skóra; Dywaniki; Materiał podsufitki; Skóra; Tapicerka z mikrofibry; Wykończenia plastikowe; Dywaniki gumowe; Winyl; Inne
hu: Kompatibilis belső anyag: Alcantara/velúr; Szőnyeg; Szövetkárpit; Műbőr; Padlószőnyegek; Tetőkárpit-szövet; Bőr; Mikroszálas kárpit; Műanyag burkolat; Gumiszőnyegek; Vinyl; Egyéb
pt-PT: Material interior compatível: Alcantara/camurça; Alcatifa; Estofos em tecido; Pele sintética; Tapetes; Tecido do forro do tejadilho; Pele; Estofos em microfibra; Acabamento em plástico; Tapetes de borracha; Vinil; Outro
hr-HR: Kompatibilni unutarnji materijal: Alcantara/brušena koža; Tepih; Presvlake od tkanine; Umjetna koža; Podni tepisi; Tkanina za krovnu oblogu; Koža; Presvlake od mikrovlakana; Plastični obrub; Gumeni tepisi; Vinil; Ostalo
it: Materiale interno compatibile: Alcantara/pelle scamosciata; Moquette; Rivestimento in tessuto; Ecopelle; Tappetini; Tessuto del cielo; Pelle; Rivestimento in microfibra; Finiture in plastica; Tappetini in gomma; Vinile; Altro
ja: 対応インテリア素材: アルカンターラ/スエード; カーペット; 布製シート; 合成皮革; フロアマット; ヘッドライナー生地; レザー; マイクロファイバー製シート; プラスチック製トリム; ラバーマット; ビニール; その他
pt-BR: Material de interior compatível: Alcântara/camurça; Carpete; Estofamento em tecido; Couro sintético; Tapetes; Tecido para teto; Couro; Estofamento de microfibra; Acabamento de plástico; Tapetes de borracha; Vinil; Outro
vi: Chất liệu nội thất tương thích: Alcantara/da lộn; Thảm; Vải bọc; Giả da; Thảm trải sàn; Vải ốp trần; Da; Sợi vi mảnh (microfiber); Ốp nhựa; Thảm cao su; Vinyl; Khác
cs: Kompatibilní materiál pro vnitřní použití: Alcantara/semiš; Koberec; Látkové čalounění; Umělá kůže; Podlahové rohože; Stropní látka; Kůže; Čalounění z mikrovlákna; Plastové obložení; Gumové rohože; Vinyl; Jiné
tr: Uyumlu iç malzeme: Alcantara/süet; Halı; Kumaş döşeme; Suni deri; Paspaslar; Tavan döşemesi kumaşı; Deri; Mikrofiber döşeme; Plastik kaplama; Kauçuk paspaslar; Vinil; Diğer
bg-BG: Съвместим вътрешен материал: Алкантара/велур; Мокет; Текстилна тапицерия; Изкуствена кожа; Стелки; Плат за таван; Кожа; Микрофибърна тапицерия; Пластмасови декоративни елементи; Гумени стелки; Винил; Друго
sv: Kompatibelt fodringsmaterial: Alcantara/mocka; Matta; Tygklädsel; Konstläder; Golvmattor; Innertakstyg; Läder; Mikrofiberklädsel; Plastdetaljer; Gummimattor; Vinyl; Övrigt
nl: Compatibel interieurmateriaal: Alcantara/suède; Tapijt; Stoffen bekleding; Kunstleer; Vloermatten; Hemelbekleding; Leer; Microvezelbekleding; Plastic afwerking; Rubberen matten; Vinyl; Overig
sl-SI: Združljiv notranji material: Alcantara/semiš; Preproga; Oblazinjenje iz blaga; Umetno usnje; Predpražniki; Tkanina za strop; Usnje; Oblazinjenje iz mikrovlaken; Plastični zaključki; Gumijasti predpražniki; Vinil; Drugo
lt-LT: Suderinama vidaus medžiaga: „Alcantara“ / zomša; Kiliminė danga; Medžiaginiai apmušalai; Dirbtinė oda; Kilimėliai; Stogo apmušalų audinys; Oda; Mikropluošto apmušalai; Plastikinė apdaila; Guminiai kilimėliai; Vinilas; Kita